Louisiana, session 2026, SB142.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3351(A)(2) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3351. General powers, duties, and functions of postsecondary education
management boards
A. Subject only to the powers of the Board of Regents specifically
enumerated in Article VIII, Section 5 of the Constitution of Louisiana, and as
otherwise provided by law, each postsecondary system management board as a body
corporate shall have authority to exercise power necessary to supervise and manage
the day-to-day operations of institutions of postsecondary education under its
control, including but not limited to the following:
* * *
(2)(a) Actively seek and accept donations, bequests, or other forms of
financial assistance for educational purposes from any public or private person or
agency and to comply with rules and regulations governing grants from the federal
government or any other person or agency which are not in contravention of the
constitution and laws.
(b) In the expenditure, investment, and use of any funds received by any
institution under its jurisdiction from the Board of Regents Support Fund,
ensure continued compliance with the Board of Regents Support Fund
endowment programs under which nonstate contributions were matched with
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 142 ENROLLED
public funds, including the initial conditions on the receipt of such funds, the
alignment of the endowment with a Board of Regents Support Fund matching
program, and the inviolability of the original corpus, inclusive of nonstate and
state contributions, as such funds derive from the Louisiana Education Quality
Trust Fund, a public fund that retains its public character notwithstanding the
ratification of its elimination by the electorate through any constitutional
amendment.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.